Hawaii statutes.
§147-56 Department, hearing, determination.
After holding a public hearing upon the establishment, alteration, or
modification of any grades, standards, or classifications, the department of
agriculture shall consider the facts and arguments presented at the hearing and
shall establish and prescribe, by rule and regulation, such grades, standards,
and classifications, or modify or alter such grades, standards, and
classifications, as it may deem best suited to the agricultural, horticultural,
or other interests of the State and the inhabitants thereof. [L 1947, c 195,
§6; RL 1955, §22-45; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS
§147-56]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next